Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-612
Petition; purposes; filed with county court.

(1) A petition may be filed for any one or more of the following purposes:

(a) To determine whether the authority of a surrogate under the Health Care Surrogacy Act is in effect or has been revoked or terminated;

(b) To determine whether the acts or proposed acts of a surrogate are consistent with the individual instruction or the individual's wishes as expressed or otherwise established by clear and convincing evidence or, when the wishes of the individual are unknown, whether the acts or proposed acts of the surrogate are clearly contrary to the best interests of the individual;

(c) To declare that the authority of a surrogate is revoked upon a determination by the court that the surrogate made or proposed to make a health care decision for the individual that authorized an illegal act or omission; or

(d) To declare that the authority of a surrogate is revoked upon a determination by the court of both of the following: (i) That the surrogate has violated, failed to perform, or is unable to perform the duty to act in a manner consistent with the individual instruction or the wishes of the individual or, when the desires of the individual are unknown, to act in a manner that is in the best interests of the individual; and (ii) that at the time of the determination by the court, the individual is unable to disqualify the surrogate as provided in subsection (7) of section 30-604.

(2) A petition under this section shall be filed with the county court of the county in which the individual resides or is located.

Laws 2018, LB104, § 12.